Foma_files/spanish.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +Sg +Pl

LEXICON Root


exit

régimen	    NInfl;
espécimen	NInfl;
hipérbaton  NInfl;
tésis		NInfl;
épsilon		NInfl;
carácter	NInfl;
parachoques NInfl;
alumno      NInfl;
amigo       NInfl;
bebé        NInfl;
chica       NInfl;
composición NInfl;
doctor      NInfl;
flor        NInfl;
interés     NInfl;
lápiz       NInfl;
nación      NInfl;
papel       NInfl;
pez         NInfl;
presidente  NInfl;
rey         NInfl;
tapiz       NInfl;
tisú        NInfl;

LEXICON NInfl

+N+Sg:0  #;
+N+Pl:^s #;
